New York, session 2025-2026, S1595.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (b-2) and (b-3) of subdivision 2 of section 2 168-f of the correction law, as added by section 2 of part O of chapter 3 56 of the laws of 2005, are amended to read as follows: 4 (b-2) If the sex offender has been given a level two or level three 5 designation, [he or she] such offender shall personally appear at the 6 law enforcement agency having jurisdiction within twenty days of the 7 first anniversary of the sex offender's initial registration and every 8 year thereafter during the period of registration for the purpose of 9 providing a current photograph of such offender. The law enforcement 10 agency having jurisdiction shall photograph the sex offender and shall 11 promptly forward a copy of such photograph to the division. For purposes 12 of this paragraph, if such sex offender is confined in a state or local 13 correctional facility, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdic- 14 tion shall be the warden, superintendent, sheriff or other person in 15 charge of the state or local correctional facility. 16 (b-3) If the sex offender has been given a level one [or level two] 17 designation, [he or she] such offender shall personally appear at the 18 law enforcement agency having jurisdiction within twenty days of the 19 third anniversary of the sex offender's initial registration and every 20 three years thereafter during the period of registration for the purpose 21 of providing a current photograph of such offender. The law enforcement 22 agency having jurisdiction shall photograph the sex offender and shall 23 promptly forward a copy of such photograph to the division. For purposes 24 of this paragraph, if such sex offender is confined in a state or local EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00613-01-5 S. 1595 2 1 correctional facility, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdic- 2 tion shall be the warden, superintendent, sheriff or other person in 3 charge of the state or local correctional facility. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 5 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.